Utah statutes.
19-6-425.   Violation of part -- Civil penalty -- Suit in district court.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 19-6-407, any person who violates any requirement of this part or any order issued or rule made under the authority of this part is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 per day for each day of violation.

(2)  The executive secretary may enforce any requirement, rule, agreement, or order issued under this part by bringing a suit in the district court in the county where the underground storage tank or petroleum storage tank is located.

(3)  The department shall deposit the penalties collected under this part in the Petroleum Storage Tank Restricted Account created under Section 19-6-405.5.

